District of Columbia statutes.
3-3610

Repealed

Investigations.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 628, Pub. L. 88-503, § 11
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(11)(A)
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 5(c), 45 DCR 745
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2610.
1973 Ed., § 2-2410.